Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.405

Merger of foreign corporation authorized to conduct affairs in this state.

Whenever a foreign corporation authorized to conduct affairs in this state shall be a party to a statutory merger permitted by the laws of the state or country under which it is incorporated, and such corporation shall be the surviving corporation, it shall, within thirty days after such merger becomes effective, file with the secretary of state a copy of the articles of merger duly authenticated by the proper officer designated under the laws of the state or country in which such statutory merger was effected; and it shall not be necessary for such corporation to procure either a new or amended certificate of authority to conduct affairs in this state unless the name of such corporation be changed thereby or unless the corporation desires to pursue in this state other or additional purposes than those which it is then authorized to pursue in this state.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 81.]